District of Columbia statutes.
42-2626

Applicability.

The provisions of this subchapter shall apply to the purchase of a single family home for which an earnest money contract is dated after April 1, 1999.

Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-266, § 7, 46 DCR 948
1981 Ed., § 45-2216.